Montana, session 2025, HB613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 22-1-327, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-1-327. State aid -- per capita -- per square mile. (1) The commission shall distribute grants to
public libraries and public library districts on a per capita and per square mile basis.
(2) The total amount of annual per capita and per square mile funding to public libraries for each
fiscal year is the base amount of 50 cents multiplied by the total number of residents of the state as determined
by the most recent decennial census of the population produced by the U.S. bureau of the census.
(3) The amount determined under subsection (2) is statutorily appropriated, as provided in 17-7-
502, from the general fund to the commission for distribution as state aid to public libraries.
(4) (a) A recipient of money pursuant to this section shall provide matching funds in cash, not in-
kind contributions. The match must represent $1 in value for each $1 of the grant.
(b) The match may not be met by utilizing other money made available by the state or the federal
government. Matching money must be contributed by local or tribal governments.
(c) To receive funding pursuant to this section, a certification must be provided by a responsible
official to confirm compliance with 22-1-326(3) and subsection (4)(b) of this section. (Subsections (2) and (3)
terminate July 1, 2029--sec. 4, Ch. 621, L. 2023.)"

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 613